de: Dehnbarkeit des Gummibands: Extra hohe Dehnbarkeit; Hohe Dehnbarkeit; Niedrige Dehnbarkeit; Mittlere Dehnbarkeit; Nicht dehnbar; Sonstige
nb: Elastisk strekknivå: Ekstra høy stretch; Høy stretch; Lav stretch; Middels stretch; Uten stretch; Annet
da: Elastisk strækniveau: Ekstra høj strækbarhed; Høj strækbarhed; Lav strækbarhed; Medium strækbarhed; Uden stræk; Andet
ru: Уровень растяжимости эластичной ленты: Сверхвысокая эластичность; Высокая эластичность; Низкая эластичность; Средняя эластичность; Неэластичный; Другое
pt-PT: nível de elasticidade: Elasticidade extra-alta; Alta elasticidade; Baixa elasticidade; Média elasticidade; Sem elasticidade; Outro
pt-BR: Nível de elasticidade do elástico: Elasticidade extra-alta; Alta elasticidade; Baixa elasticidade; Média elasticidade; Sem elasticidade; Outro
nl: Elastiek rekniveau: Extra veel rek; Veel rek; Weinig rek; Gemiddelde rek; Niet-elastisch; Overige
vi: Mức độ giãn của thun: Độ co giãn cực cao; Độ co giãn cao; Độ co giãn thấp; Độ co giãn trung bình; Không co giãn; Khác
it: livello di allungamento elastico: Elasticità extra elevata; Elasticità elevata; Elasticità bassa; Elasticità media; Non elastico; Altro
es: Nivel de elasticidad: Estiramiento extra alto; Estiramiento alto; Estiramiento bajo; Estiramiento medio; Sin estiramiento; Otro
tr: Elastik esneme seviyesi: Ekstra yüksek esneme; Yüksek esneme; Düşük esneme; Orta esneme; Esnemez; Diğer
fi: Kuminauhan venytystaso: Erittäin suuri venyvyys; Suuri venyvyys; Vähäinen venyvyys; Keskinkertainen venyvyys; Joustamaton; Muu
ro-RO: Nivel de întindere elastică: Elasticitate foarte ridicată; Elasticitate ridicată; Elasticitate redusă; Elasticitate medie; Neelastic; Altele
en: Elastic stretch level: Extra high stretch; High stretch; Low stretch; Medium stretch; Non-stretch; Other
sv: Elastisk stretchnivå: Extra hög stretch; Hög stretch; Låg stretch; Medelhög stretch; Ingen stretch; Övrigt
zh-CN: 松紧带拉伸等级: 超高弹力; 高弹力; 低弹力; 中弹力; 无弹力; 其他
hu: Rugalmas anyag nyúlási szintje: Extra magas nyúlású; Magas nyúlású; Alacsony nyúlású; Közepes nyúlású; Nem nyúlékony; Egyéb
th: ระดับความยืดหยุ่น: ยืดหยุ่นสูงพิเศษ; ยืดหยุ่นสูง; ยืดหยุ่นต่ำ; ยืดหยุ่นปานกลาง; ไม่ยืดหยุ่น; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Stopnja elastičnega raztezanja: Zelo visoka raztegljivost; Visoka raztegljivost; Nizka raztegljivost; Srednja raztegljivost; Neraztegljivo; Drugo
el: Επίπεδο ελαστικής τάνυσης: Πολύ υψηλή ελαστικότητα; Υψηλή ελαστικότητα; Χαμηλή ελαστικότητα; Μεσαία ελαστικότητα; Χωρίς ελαστικότητα; Άλλο
cs: Stupeň elastického roztažení: Extra vysoká průtažnost; Vysoká průtažnost; Nízká průtažnost; Střední průtažnost; Neprůtažné; Jiné
zh-TW: 鬆緊帶拉伸程度: 極高彈性; 高彈性; 低彈性; 中等彈性; 無彈性; 其他
sk-SK: Úroveň elastického natiahnutia: Extra vysoká elasticita; Vysoká elasticita; Nízka elasticita; Stredná elasticita; Neelastické; Iné
lt-LT: Elastinės juostos tamprumo lygis: Ypač didelis tamprumas; Didelis tamprumas; Mažas tamprumas; Vidutinis tamprumas; Netampri; Kita
ja: 弾性体伸縮レベル: 超高伸縮; 高伸縮; 低伸縮; 中伸縮; 非伸縮; その他
ko: 신축성 수준: 매우 높은 신축성; 높은 신축성; 낮은 신축성; 중간 신축성; 신축성 없음; 기타
hr-HR: Razina elastičnog rastezanja: Iznimno visoka rastezljivost; Visoka rastezljivost; Niska rastezljivost; Srednja rastezljivost; Bez rastezanja; Ostalo
bg-BG: Степен на разтегливост на ластика: Изключително висока еластичност; Висока еластичност; Ниска еластичност; Средна еластичност; Нееластичен; Друго
pl: Poziom rozciągliwości gumy: Bardzo wysoka rozciągliwość; Wysoka rozciągliwość; Niska rozciągliwość; Średnia rozciągliwość; Nierozciągliwe; Inne
fr: Niveau d’extensibilité de l’élastique: Extensibilité très élevée; Haute extensibilité; Faible extensibilité; Extensibilité moyenne; Non extensible; Autre